Vermont, session 2025-2026, S309.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Termination of Residential Rental Agreement * * *
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 137 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 137. RESIDENTIAL RENTAL AGREEMENTS
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 2 of 29
Subchapter 1. General
§ 4451. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Actual notice” means receipt of written notice either:
(i) hand-delivered or;
(ii) delivered by sheriff service;
(iii) mailed to the last known address or the address provided in
the residential rental agreement;
(iv) posted on the door of the dwelling unit and mailed as
described in subdivision (iii) of this subdivision (1)(A); or
(v) emailed to an email address included in the lease agreement
and mailed as described in subdivision (iii) of this subdivision (1)(A).
(B) A rebuttable presumption that the notice was received three days
after mailing is created if the sending party proves that the notice was sent by
first-class or certified U.S. mail.
* * *
(11) “Immediate family” means:
(A) an adult person related by blood, adoption, marriage, or as
defined or described in similar law in another jurisdiction;
(B) an unmarried parent of a joint child;
(C) a child, grandchild, foster child, ward, or guardian; or
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 3 of 29
(D) a child, grandchild, foster child, ward, or guardian of any
person listed in subdivision (A) or (B) of this subdivision (11).
* * *
Subchapter 2. Residential Rental Agreements
§ 4456a. RESIDENTIAL RENTAL APPLICATION
(a)(1) A landlord or a landlord’s agent shall not charge an application fee to
any individual in order to apply to enter into a rental agreement for a
residential dwelling unit. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a
person from charging a fee to a person in order to apply to rent commercial or
nonresidential property.
(2) As used in this section, an “application fee” includes any fee or
charge to submit a residential rental application or conduct a background check
on a residential applicant, a third-party processing payment, and any other
costs associated with a rental agreement application.
(3) A landlord or a landlord’s agent may charge a nominal fee to
conduct a credit check of an applicant, unless the tenant or applicant provides a
credit check as part of the application, in which case the landlord or landlord’s
agent shall not charge a fee.
* * *
(c) A person who violates this section commits an unfair practice in
commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 4 of 29
* * *
§ 4461. SECURITY DEPOSITS
(a)(1) A security deposit is any advance, deposit, or prepaid rent, however
named, which is refundable to the tenant at the termination or expiration of the
tenancy. The function of a security deposit is to secure the performance of a
tenant’s obligations to pay rent and to maintain a dwelling unit.
(2) A landlord shall not charge for or receive a security deposit
exceeding an amount equal to two months’ rent, in addition to any rent for the
first month paid on or before initial occupancy.
* * *
§ 4467. TERMINATION OF TENANCY; NOTICE
(a) Termination for nonpayment of rent. The landlord may terminate a
tenancy for nonpayment of rent by providing actual notice to the tenant of the
date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least 14 seven days
after the date of the actual notice. The rental agreement shall not terminate if
the tenant pays or tenders rent due through the end of the rental period in
which payment is made or tendered. Acceptance of partial payment of rent
shall not constitute a waiver of the landlord’s remedies for nonpayment of rent
or an accord and satisfaction for nonpayment of rent.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 5 of 29
(b) Termination for breach of rental agreement.
(1)(A) The landlord may terminate a tenancy for failure of the tenant to
comply with a material term of the rental agreement or with obligations
imposed under this chapter by actual notice given to the tenant at least 30 21
days prior to the termination date specified in the notice.
(B) Failure to comply with a material term of the rental agreement or
with obligations imposed under this chapter includes:
(i) repeated late payment of rent;
(ii) refusal to allow a landlord or landlord’s agent access to the
dwelling unit;
(iii) the tenant’s refusal to sign a rental agreement renewal or
accept reasonable changes to the rental agreement; and
(iv) the tenant’s interference with the health and safety of the
landlord, landlord’s agent, other residents, or neighbors.
(2) When termination is based on criminal activity, illegal drug activity,
or acts of violence, damage to the dwelling unit or premises, or other activity
any of which threaten threatens the health or safety of other residents, the
landlord or landlord’s agent, or neighbors, the landlord may terminate the
tenancy by providing actual notice to the tenant of the date on which the
tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least 14 three days from the date of
the actual notice.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 6 of 29
(3) The actual notice required under this subsection shall be
accompanied by an affidavit setting forth particular facts in support of the
termination with sufficient details to inform the tenant of the reasoning behind
the termination.
(c) Termination for no cause Termination for tenant or governmental notice
to vacate. In the absence of a written rental agreement, the landlord may
terminate a tenancy for no cause as follows:
(1) If rent is payable on a monthly basis, by providing actual notice to
the tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be:
(A) for tenants who have resided continuously in the same premises
for two years or less, at least 60 days after the date of the actual notice;
(B) for tenants who have resided continuously in the same premises
for more than two years, at least 90 days after the date of the actual notice
When termination is based on an intent to vacate provided by actual notice
from a tenant, a landlord may terminate a rental agreement on the date
provided in the actual notice.
(2) If rent is payable on a weekly basis, by providing actual notice to the
tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least
21 days after the date of the actual notice When termination is based on
compliance with an order issued by a governmental agency or court order that
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 7 of 29
necessitates vacating the premises, a landlord may terminate a rental agreement
on the date provided in the order.
(d) Termination of rental agreement when property is sold or repurposed.
(1) In the absence of a written rental agreement, a landlord who has
contracted to sell the building may terminate a tenancy by providing actual
notice to the tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall
be at least 30 days after the date of the actual notice, when a landlord:
(A) has contracted to sell the building;
(B) has a good faith intention for the landlord or a member of the
landlord’s immediate family to occupy the premises for a minimum of 12
continuous months as a primary residence;
(C) intends to permanently withdraw the dwelling unit from the
rental market; or
(D) intends to demolish the dwelling unit or premises or the rental
unit requires renovations that exceed 50 percent of the rental unit’s value to
become or remain habitable, provided that the tenant shall have the right of
first refusal to reoccupy the unit at market rate following renovations.
(2) In the event of a written rental agreement, the actual notice to
terminate under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be at least 30 days
before the end or expiration of the stated term of the rental agreement.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 8 of 29
(e) Termination for no cause under terms of written at the expiration of a
rental agreement.
(1) If there is a written rental agreement, the notice to terminate for no
cause shall be at least 30 days before the end or expiration of the stated term of
the rental agreement if the tenancy has continued for two years or less. The
notice to terminate for no cause shall be at least 60 days before the end or
expiration of the term of the rental agreement if the tenancy has continued for
more than two years. If there is a written week-to-week rental agreement, the
notice to terminate for no cause shall be at least seven days; however, a notice
to terminate for nonpayment of rent shall be as provided in subsection (a) of
this section
(2) In the absence of a written rental agreement, the notice to terminate
shall be at least 30 days after the date of actual notice if the tenancy has
continued for two years or less. The notice to terminate shall be at least 60
days after the date of actual notice if the tenancy has continued for more than
two years.
(f) Termination date. In all cases, the termination date shall be specifically
stated in the notice.
(g) Conversion to condominium. If the building is being converted to
condominiums, notice shall be given in accordance with 27 V.S.A. chapter 15,
subchapter 2.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 9 of 29
(h) Termination of shared occupancy. A rental arrangement whereby a
person rents to another individual one or more rooms in his or her the person’s
personal residence that includes the shared use of any of the common living
spaces, such as the living room, kitchen, or bathroom, may be terminated by
either party by providing actual notice to the other of the date the rental
agreement shall terminate, which shall be at least 15 days after the date of
actual notice if the rent is payable monthly and at least seven days after the
date of actual notice if the rent is payable weekly.
(i) Multiple notices. All actual notices that are in compliance with this
section shall not invalidate any other actual notice and shall be a valid basis for
commencing and maintaining an action for possession pursuant to this chapter,
10 V.S.A. chapter 153, 11 V.S.A. chapter 14, or 12 V.S.A. chapter 169,
notwithstanding that the notices may be based on different or unrelated
grounds, dates of termination, or that the notices are sent at different times
prior to or during an ejectment action. A landlord may maintain an ejectment
action and rely on as many grounds for ejectment as are allowed by law at any
time during the eviction process.
(j) Payment after termination; effect.
(1) A landlord’s acceptance of full or partial rent payment by or on
behalf of a tenant after the termination of the tenancy for reasons other than
nonpayment of rent or at any time during the ejectment action shall not result
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 10 of 29
in the dismissal of an ejectment action or constitute a waiver of the landlord’s
remedies to proceed with an eviction action based on any of the following:
(A) the tenant’s breach of the terms of a rental agreement pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section;
(B) the tenant’s breach of the tenant’s obligations pursuant to
subsections 4456(a), (b), and (c) of this title; or
(C) for no cause pursuant to subsections (c), (d), (e), and (h) of this
section.
(2) This subsection shall apply to 10 V.S.A. chapter 153, 11 V.S.A.
chapter 14, and 12 V.S.A. chapter 169.
(k) Commencement of ejectment action. A notice to terminate a tenancy
shall be insufficient to support a judgment of eviction unless the proceeding is
commenced not later than 30 days from the termination date set forth in the
notice when provided pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section and not
later than 60 days from the termination date set forth in the notice for all other
terminations.
(l) Affirmative defense to ejectment action.
(1) For any eviction action based on a failure to pay rent pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, it shall be an affirmative defense of the tenant,
and the ejectment shall be dismissed, if there exists a serious health and safety
code violation, which shall include:
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 11 of 29
(A) any condition that jeopardizes the security of the unit;
(B) major plumbing leaks, flooding, or waterlogged ceiling or
flooring in imminent danger of falling in;
(C) gas or fuel oil leaks;
(D) electrical conditions that could result in shock or fire;
(E) absence of a working heating system when outside temperature is
below 60 degrees Fahrenheit;
(F) utilities not in service, including no running hot water;
(G) conditions that present the immediate possibility of serious
injury;
(H) obstacles that prevent the safe entrance into or exit from the
dwelling unit;
(I) absence of a functional toilet within the dwelling unit; or
(J) inoperable smoke or carbon monoxide detectors.
(2) A tenant may not defeat an ejectment action if it is found that the
serious health and safety code violation is the result of the tenant’s deliberate
or negligent actions leading to the violation.
(3) This subsection shall apply to 10 V.S.A. chapter 153, 11 V.S.A.
chapter 14, and 12 V.S.A. chapter 169.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 12 of 29
§ 4468. TERMINATION OF TENANCY; ACTION FOR POSSESSION
If the tenant remains in possession after termination of the rental agreement
without the express consent of the landlord, the landlord may bring an action
for possession, damages, and costs:
(1) for a termination provided under subsections 4467(a) and (b) of this
title, under 12 V.S.A. chapter 169, subchapter 4; and
(2) for all other terminations provided in section 4467 of this title, under
12 V.S.A. chapter 169, subchapter 3.
* * *
§ 4468b. MAXIMUM INCREASE IN RENT
(a) A landlord shall not increase rent:
(1) more than once in any 12-month period; or
(2) in any amount deemed excessive or unreasonable.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, upon purchasing a
dwelling unit, a landlord may raise the rent in accordance with section 4455 of
this title. In the event a landlord raises rent upon the purchase of a dwelling
unit, the landlord shall thereafter be subject to subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If raising the rent under subdivision (1) of this subsection, a landlord
shall not increase the rent more than three percentage points above the U.S.
Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers, Housing Component,
published by the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics in the periodical Monthly
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 13 of 29
Labor Review and Handbook of Labor Statistics as published annually by the
Department of Housing and Community Development.
(3) In the event rent was raised within six months prior to the purchase
of a dwelling unit, in calculating the rent increase under subdivision (2) of this
subsection, a landlord shall calculate the increase based on the rental amount
that was charged prior to the most recent increase in rent.
* * *
* * * Just Cause Ejectment Process * * *
Sec. 2. 12 V.S.A. chapter 169, subchapter 4 is added to read:
Subchapter 4. Superior Court Ejectment for Just Cause
§ 4861. ISSUANCE OF PROCESS FOR JUST CAUSE BY SUPERIOR
JUDGE
When the lessee of lands or tenements, either by parole or written lease, or a
person holding under the lease, holds possession of the demised premises
without right, after the termination of the lease under 9 V.S.A. § 4467(a) or (b),
the person entitled to the possession of the premises may have from the
presiding judge of the Superior Court a writ to restore the person to the
possession thereof.
§ 4862. MODE AND SERVICE OF PROCESS; TRIAL BY JURY
PROHIBITED
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 14 of 29
(a) The process may issue as a summons or writ of attachment, requiring
the defendant to appear and answer to the complaint of the plaintiff, which
shall state that the defendant is in the possession of the lands or tenements in
question (describing them), which the tenant holds unlawfully and against the
right of the plaintiff. A copy of the rental agreement, if any, and any notice to
terminate the defendant’s tenancy shall be attached to the complaint, including
a copy of the rent ledger if the compliant is based on a termination under
9 V.S.A. § 4467(a).
(b) Neither party shall have the right to a trial by jury.
§ 4863. ANSWER
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, the
defendant shall file an answer within seven days after receiving the complaint.
(b) An answer to a complaint filed under this subchapter shall be
accompanied by an affidavit setting forth particular facts in opposition to the
complaint.
(c)(1) If the complaint is based on a termination under 9 V.S.A. § 4467(a),
the defendant may cure the action by paying all rents owed, court costs, and
service fees by the answer date. If payment is not received by the answer date,
the defendant shall lose the right to cure the complaint as a matter of law. A
plaintiff may accept payment in whole or in part and dismiss the complaint. A
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 15 of 29
defendant shall not have the right to cure in a subsequent action brought by the
plaintiff for termination under 9 V.S.A. § 4467(a).
(2) Upon receipt of an answer to a complaint based on a termination
under 9 V.S.A. § 4467(a), the court shall set a final hearing date not later than
60 days from the filing of the complaint.
§ 4864. DEFAULT
If the defendant fails to provide a written answer as provided in this
subchapter, the plaintiff shall be entitled to possession of the premises. The
plaintiff shall file a motion for possession based on the default and shall
include an affidavit that provides proof of service on the defendant. The court
shall decide on the motion within three days after the filing by the plaintiff.
§ 4865. SHOW CAUSE HEARING
(a) If the complaint is based on a termination under 9 V.S.A. § 4467(b)(2),
the court shall set a show cause hearing within seven days after an answer is
filed by the defendant. If the defendant fails to appear, the plaintiff shall be
awarded possession of the premises.
(b) At the show cause hearing, the defendant shall prove a substantiated
defense to the termination claims brought by the plaintiff.
(c)(1) Parties may rely on affidavit evidence during the show cause hearing
made under the pains and penalties of perjury. If the defendant makes a
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 16 of 29
credible showing that live testimony is required or upon the court’s own
determination, a final hearing may be ordered.
(2) In the event a final hearing is ordered to resolve the complaint, a
final hearing shall be set within 30 days from the date of the initial complaint.
§ 4866. COSTS; JUDGMENT FOR PLAINTIFF; POSSESSION
If the court finds the plaintiff is entitled to possession, whether by default or
after a final hearing, the plaintiff shall have a judgment for possession and
rents due, if applicable, including damages and costs, and when a written rental
agreement so provides, the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees. A writ
of possession shall issue on the date of judgment and shall direct any sheriff to
serve the writ upon the defendant and, not earlier than seven days after the writ
is served, put the plaintiff in possession.
§ 4867. SERVICE BY POSTING
[Reserved.]
§ 4868. PROPERTY OF TENANT REMAINING ON PREMISES AFTER
EVICTION
A landlord may dispose of any personal property remaining in a dwelling
unit or leased premises without notice or liability to the tenant or owner of the
personal property upon the landlord being legally restored to possession of the
dwelling unit or leased premises pursuant to this subchapter.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 17 of 29
§ 4869. TRESPASS ORDERS
(a) After the execution of a writ of possession, the plaintiff may issue the
defendant an order against trespass for the entire premises subject to the
ejectment action.
(b) The order shall be effective and may be enforced with criminal
penalties in accordance with 13 V.S.A. § 3705, regardless of whether the
defendant has been invited onto the property by another resident.
* * * Trespass * * *
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 3705 is amended to read:
§ 3705. UNLAWFUL TRESPASS
(a)(1) A person shall be imprisoned for not more than three months or fined
not more than $500.00, or both, if, without legal authority or the consent of the
person in lawful possession, the person enters or remains on any land or in any
place as to which notice against trespass is given by:
* * *
(3) If a person has been issued an order against trespass under 12 V.S.A.
§ 4869, it shall be a violation of this subsection if the person enters or remains
on any land or in any place subject to the order against trespass regardless of
whether the person has the consent of the person in lawful possession of the
land or place.
* * *
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 18 of 29
* * * Ejectment Records * * *
Sec. 4. 12 V.S.A. chapter 169, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. Confidentiality of Ejectment Records
§ 4871. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Confidential” means to limit access only to those persons who are
authorized by law or court order to view the record. A confidential record does
not limit public access to court hearings in an ejectment case. All ejectment
court hearings shall remain open to the public. Names of parties shall not be
listed on the court calendar.
(2) “Consumer reporting agency” has the same meaning as in 15 U.S.C.
§ 1681a(f).
(3) “Ejectment record” means recorded information pertaining to an
ejectment case that is in the possession, custody, or control of a court or was in
the possession of a court.
(4) “Landlord” has the same meaning as in 9 V.S.A. § 4451(4).
(5) “Record” means any recorded information made or received
pursuant to law or in connection with the transaction of any official business
by a court, including all evidence received by the court in a case.
(6) “Removal of confidentiality” means to restore an ejectment record to
the level of public access a public court record enjoys by removing any
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 19 of 29
physical and electronic separation imposed on the ejectment record when it
was confidential.
(7) “Tenant” has the same meaning as in 9 V.S.A. § 4451(10).
(8) “Tenant screening report” means any written, oral, or other
communication prepared by a consumer reporting agency that includes
information about an individual’s rental history for the purpose of serving as a
factor in establishing the individual’s eligibility for housing.
(9) “Termination notice” means any notice given under 9 V.S.A. § 4467.
§ 4872. CONFIDENTIALITY OF RECORD UPON FILING
All records of a newly filed ejectment complaint shall be confidential. The
ejectment record shall be designated as confidential upon filing and shall
remain confidential except pursuant to section 4873 of this title.
§ 4873. REMOVAL OF CONFIDENTIALITY OF FOR-CAUSE
EJECTMENT RECORDS
(a) If the court of jurisdiction in an ejectment case issues a final judgment
after an evidentiary hearing in favor of the landlord where a finding has been
made of nonpayment of rent pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 4467(a) or breach of rental
agreement pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 4467(b), the court shall remove
confidentiality for the ejectment record after 30 days unless the court orders
continued confidentiality pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 20 of 29
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the court shall order
that the ejectment record will remain confidential if the parties so stipulate or
upon a tenant’s showing of good cause within six months after final judgment.
(2) A showing that the defendant meets any of the following conditions
is deemed good cause for purposes of this subsection:
(A) the defendant has been a victim of abuse as defined by 15 V.S.A.
§ 1101(1) and established by self-certification;
(B) the defendant is a person with a disability as that term is defined
in 9 V.S.A. § 4501; or
(C) the defendant is a member of a protected class as defined by
9 V.S.A. § 4503(a)(2).
§ 4874. EFFECT OF CONFIDENTIALITY; PROHIBITIONS
(a) The ejectment case underlying a confidential ejectment record is
deemed never to have occurred. A person who is asked about the person’s
ejectment history may answer that there is no prior ejectment if the record is
confidential.
(b)(1) A consumer reporting agency shall check Vermont court ejectment
records to determine whether they are confidential before including them in a
tenant screening report.
(2) A consumer reporting agency shall not include any ejectment record
in a tenant screening report if the court record is confidential or if the
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 21 of 29
consumer reporting agency has been directly notified that the record is
confidential.
(c) Any tenant who suffers injury as a result of a violation of subsection (b)
of this section may bring an action for injunctive relief, actual damages, or
statutory damages of up to $1,000.00 per violation, costs, and reasonable
attorney’s fees.
§ 4875. ACCESS TO CONFIDENTIAL RECORDS; PARTIES TO ACTION
The court of jurisdiction in an ejectment case shall make the confidential
ejectment record available to each of the following persons for purposes of
litigating, adjudicating, joining, appealing, or otherwise facilitating the
ejectment case:
(1) each party to the ejectment case;
(2) the judge and court staff of jurisdiction;
(3) each occupant of the leased property described in the complaint;
(4) each attorney representing a party to the ejectment case;
(5) each attorney considering undertaking representation of a party to
the ejectment case, provided the attorney certifies to the court’s satisfaction
that:
(A) the party has requested the attorney’s representation and has
authorized the attorney’s access to the ejectment record;
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 22 of 29
(B) the ejectment record will be used only for legal assistance and not
for any commercial purpose; and
(C) the attorney is authorized to practice in the State;
(6) Vermont Legal Aid; and
(7) Legal Services Vermont.
§ 4876. ACCESS TO CONFIDENTIAL RECORDS; OTHERS
(a) In addition to access provided in section 4875 of this title, the court of
jurisdiction shall make a confidential ejectment record available for any
authorized purpose under subsection (b) of this section to any person with a
valid court order authorizing access to the ejectment record.
(b) Upon motion and subject to a balancing of interests for and against
disclosure, the court of jurisdiction shall make a confidential ejectment record
available to a requesting party for scholarly, educational, journalistic, or
governmental purposes. Records made available under this subsection shall
not include the identifying information of any party unless the court of
jurisdiction determines that the request is appropriate and that the release of the
identifying information is necessary to fulfill the purpose of the request and
that the identifying information will not be released to the public.
* * * Positive Rental Payment Pilot Program * * *
Sec. 5. POSITIVE RENTAL PAYMENT CREDIT REPORTING PILOT
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 23 of 29
(1) “Contractor” means the third-party vendor that the State Treasurer’s
office contracts with to administer the pilot program described in this section.
(2) “Dwelling unit” has the same meaning as in 9 V.S.A. § 4451(3).
(3) “Participant property owner” means a landlord that has agreed in
writing to participate in the pilot program and has satisfied the requirements
described in subsection (c) of this section.
(4) “Participant tenant” means a tenant who has elected to participate in
the pilot program and whose landlord is a participant property owner.
(5) “Rental payment information” means information concerning a
participant tenant’s timely payment of rent. “Rent payment information” does
not include information concerning a participant tenant’s payment or
nonpayment of fees.
(b) Pilot program creation.
(1) The State Treasurer shall create and implement a two-year positive
rental payment credit reporting pilot program to facilitate the reporting of rent
payment information from participant tenants to consumer reporting agencies.
(2) On or before May 1, 2027, the State Treasurer shall contract with a
third party to administer a positive rental payment credit reporting pilot
program and facilitate the transmission of rent reporting information from a
participant property owner to a consumer reporting agency. The third-party
administrator shall be required to:
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 24 of 29
(A) enter into an agreement with one or more participant property
owners in the State in accordance with the requirements of this section for
participation in the pilot program;
(B) ensure that information to a credit reporting agency includes only
rent payment information after the date on which the participant tenant elected
to participate in the pilot program;
(C) develop and implement a process for removal of participant
tenants for failure to comply with program requirements, including failure to
make timely rental payments;
(D) establish a standard form for a participant tenant to use to elect to
participate or cease participation in the pilot program, which shall include a
statement that the tenant’s participation is voluntary and that a participant may
cease participating in the pilot program at any time and for any reason by
providing notice to the participant’s landlord and that the tenant may be
removed from the program for failure to comply with program requirements,
including failure to make timely rental payments; and
(E) offer an optional financial education course for participant
tenants.
(c) Pilot program agreements. A participant property owner shall agree in
writing:
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 25 of 29
(1) to participate in the pilot program for the duration of the pilot
program;
(2) not to charge a participant tenant for participation in the pilot
program;
(3) to comply with the requirements of the pilot program;
(4) to provide information as required by the State Treasurer concerning
the implementation of the pilot program; and
(5) to assist in the recruitment of tenants to participate in the pilot
program.
(d) Pilot program participants. On or before June 1, 2027, the contractor
shall, in coordination with the State Treasurer, recruit not more than 10
participant property owners and, to the extent practicable, not fewer than 100
participant tenants, to participate in the pilot program. The contractor shall
seek to select participant tenants from populations that are underserved and
underrepresented in home ownership. The contractor shall also seek to recruit
participant landlords who offer:
(1) a variety of types of dwelling units for rent, including dwelling units
of various sizes;
(2) dwelling units for rent that are located in geographically diverse
areas of the State; and
(3) at least five dwelling units for rent.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 26 of 29
(e) Termination. The State Treasurer may terminate the pilot program at
any time in the Treasurer’s sole discretion or terminate participation of a
participant property owner for failure to comply with the requirements of the
pilot program.
(f) Reports.
(1) On or before November 1, 2028, the State Treasurer shall submit an
interim report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs regarding
the findings of the pilot program. The report shall include:
(A) the number of participant tenants, including information
regarding the demographic makeup of participant tenants, such as race,
ethnicity, gender, income, and age, as voluntarily provided by the participant;
(B) the number of participant tenants who ceased participating in the
pilot program voluntarily;
(C) the number of participant tenants who were removed from the
pilot program and the reasons why;
(D) a breakdown of costs of administering the pilot program,
including the monthly costs associated with rent reporting;
(E) a description of challenges faced by the participant property
owners and participant tenants during the pilot program;
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 27 of 29
(F) an analysis of the outcomes of rent reporting on participant
tenants’ credit scores; and
(G) recommendations for legislative action, including proposed
statutory language and an appropriation for associated costs.
(2) On or before November 1, 2029, the State Treasurer shall submit a
final report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs regarding
the findings of the pilot program. The report shall include an update to the
information required in the interim report.
* * * Residential Security Deposit Transition Period * * *
Sec. 6. SECURITY DEPOSIT; TRANSITION PERIOD
Notwithstanding 9 V.S.A. § 4461(a), a landlord may retain a security
deposit that exceeds an amount equal to two months’ rent, provided that the
residential rental agreement was in effect prior to July 1, 2026.
* * * Technical Training * * *
Sec. 7. LANDLORD AND TENANT EDUCATION AND TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
(a) The Champlain Valley Office of Economic Opportunity (CVOEO) shall
provide education and technical assistance to Vermont landlords and tenants
regarding their rights, obligations, and remedies for statutory violations under
Vermont rental statutes.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 28 of 29
(b)(1) Training for tenants shall include training under the Preferred Renter
Certification Program or its future equivalent.
(2) For landlords, CVOEO shall work in partnership with the Vermont
Landlords’ Association, Vermont Legal Aid, and the Vermont Human Rights
Commission to develop a curriculum to address any resource and information
gaps to increase positive interactions with tenants and improve renter
household stability.
(c) Assistance under this program shall include in-person, virtual, and on-
demand options.
* * * Appropriations * * *
Sec. 8. APPROPRIATIONS
The following is appropriated from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027:
(1) the sum of $100,000.00 to the State Treasurer to implement the
positive rental payment credit reporting pilot program; and
(2) the sum of $1,200,000.00 to the Department of Housing and
Community Development for the following purposes:
(A) $1,000,000.00 granted to the Vermont State Housing Authority
for the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund established by 2023 Acts and Resolves
No. 47, Sec. 45; and
(B) $200,000.00 granted to the Champlain Valley Office of
Economic Opportunity for statewide landlord and tenant education.
VT LEG #386003 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.309
2026 Page 29 of 29
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386003 v.2